src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/Pron-mon_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.

  Pron - мон: # Pronoun  мон 'eng /udm /fin' - full paradigm
     мон+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Nom: мон
     мон+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Gen: мынам
     мон+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Dat: мыным
     мон+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Abl: мынэсьтым
     мон+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Acc: монэ
     мон+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Ins: [монэн, монэным]
     мон+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Abe: монтэк
     мон+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Apr: монлань
     мон+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Advl: монъя
#
     тон+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Nom: тон
     тон+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Gen: тынад
     тон+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Dat: тыныд
     тон+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Abl: тынэсьтыд
     тон+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Acc: тонэ
     тон+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Ins: [тонэн, тонэныд]
     тон+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Abe: тонтэк
     тон+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Apr: тонлань
     тон+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Advl: тонъя
#
     со+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Nom: со
     со+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Gen: солэн
     со+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Dat: солы
     со+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Abl: солэсь
     со+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Acc: сое
     со+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Ins: соин
     со+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Abe: сотэк
     со+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Apr: солань
     со+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Advl: соя
#
     ми+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Nom: ми
     ми+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Gen: милям
     ми+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Dat: [милемлы, милем]
     ми+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Abl: милэсьтым
     ми+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Acc: [милемыз, милемды]
     ми+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Ins: [милемын, миленымы]
     ми+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Abe: митэк
     ми+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Apr: милань
     ми+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Advl: мия
#
     тӥ+Pron+Pers+Pl2+Nom: тӥ
     тӥ+Pron+Pers+Pl2+Gen: тӥляд
     тӥ+Pron+Pers+Pl2+Dat: [тӥледлы, тӥлед]
     тӥ+Pron+Pers+Pl2+Abl: тӥлэсьтыд
     тӥ+Pron+Pers+Pl2+Acc: [тӥледыз, тӥледды]
     тӥ+Pron+Pers+Pl2+Ins: [тӥледын, тӥленыды]
     тӥ+Pron+Pers+Pl2+Abe: тӥтэк
     тӥ+Pron+Pers+Pl2+Apr: тӥлань
     тӥ+Pron+Pers+Pl2+Advl: тӥя
#
     соос+Pron+Pers+Pl+Nom: соос
     соос+Pron+Pers+Pl+Gen: соослэн
     соос+Pron+Pers+Pl+Dat: соослы
     соос+Pron+Pers+Pl+Abl: соослэсь
     соос+Pron+Pers+Pl+Acc: [соосыз, соосты]
     соос+Pron+Pers+Pl+Ins: соосын
     соос+Pron+Pers+Pl+Abe: соостэк
     соос+Pron+Pers+Pl+Apr: соослань
     соос+Pron+Pers+Pl+Advl: соосъя
